North Carolina, session 2025, SB692.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 9D.3(b) of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 9D.3.(b) Fees for families who are required to share in the cost of care are
established based on ten percent (10%) five percent (5%) of gross family income. When care is
received at the blended rate, the copayment shall be eighty-three percent (83%) of the full-time
copayment. Copayments for part-time care shall be seventy-five percent (75%) of the full-time
copayment."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S692-v-1*